Washington statutes.
RCW 27.34.280

Advisory council, heritage council—Financial and administrative services.

The department shall provide administrative and financial services to the advisory council on historic preservation and to the Washington state heritage council.

[ 1986 c 266 s 15; 1983 c 91 s 16.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.